District of Columbia statutes.
6-219

Procurement.

Until the Board promulgates procurement regulations in accordance with this section, the Authority’s existing rules governing procurement shall continue to apply. Within 180 days of May 9, 2000, the Board shall transmit proposed procurement regulations to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the regulations shall be deemed approved. The Board’s procurement regulations shall include rules and procedures governing public notice of invitations to bid; methods of source selection, including competitive sealed bidding and competitive sealed proposals; small purchase procurements; cost principles; delivery and performance; contract modification; and contract termination. The Procurement Act shall not apply to contracts and contractors of the Authority, except that subchapter IX of Chapter 6 of Title 1 shall apply to contract protests, appeals, and claims arising from procurements of the Housing Authority.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 20, 47 DCR 1325

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-203.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.